California, session 20252026, AB2130.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 18613 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:18613. (a) (1) The commission shall appoint a person exempt from civil service who shall be designated as an executive officer and who shall exercise the powers and perform the duties delegated by the commission and vested in the executive officer by this chapter. The appointment of the executive officer is subject to the approval of the Director of Consumer Affairs.(2) The commission may employ a chief athletic inspector. If the commission employs a chief athletic inspector, the chief athletic inspector shall exercise the powers and perform the duties delegated by the commission and authorized by the executive officer related to the regulation of events under this chapter.(3) The commission may employ an assistant chief athletic inspector. If the commission employs an assistant chief athletic inspector, the assistant chief athletic inspector shall assist the chief athletic inspector in exercising the powers and performing the duties delegated by the commission and authorized by the executive officer related to the regulation of events under this chapter.(4) The commission may employ an assistant chief athletic inspector in charge of training. If the commission employs an assistant chief athletic inspector in charge of training, the assistant chief athletic inspector in charge of training shall assist the chief athletic inspector in exercising the powers and performing the duties delegated by the commission and authorized by the executive officer related to regulation of events under this chapter.(5) The commission may employ in accordance with Section 154 other personnel as may be necessary for the administration of this chapter.(b) (1) (A) Pursuant to Section 820.2 of the Government Code, the executive officer appointed pursuant to this section shall not be liable for discretionary acts taken while performing duties pursuant to this chapter.(B) This paragraph is declaratory of existing law and does not constitute a change in existing law.(2) The approval of contests and the assignment of officials for contests by the executive officer under this chapter shall be considered discretionary acts pursuant to Section 820.2 of the Government Code.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 18829 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:18829. (a) (1) Subject to subdivision (e), the commission may do both of the following:(A) Enter into a contract with an approved sponsor to place the sponsor’s name or logo, as approved by the commission, on referee referee, judge, and ringside physician apparel.(B) Enter into an agreement with an Indian tribe or a nonprofit organization to display the name, logo, insignia, or brand, as approved by the commission, of the Indian tribe or nonprofit organization as described in subparagraph (A).(2) A contract or agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall be at the discretion of the commission, subject to all of the following, as applicable:(A)The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(B)The the State Contracting Manual, the State Administrative Manual, the Public Contract Code, and the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government						Code.(C)Any Code, and any other applicable bidding and state contracting requirement. requirements.(b) Notwithstanding Section 18800, payment received by the commission for a sponsorship pursuant to this section shall be distributed as follows:(1) Seventy-five percent of the payment shall be divided between the Boxers’ Pension Fund and the Mixed Martial Arts Retirement Benefit Fund in a manner that fairly represents the revenue derived from each segment, as determined by the commission and set forth in the sponsorship contract.(2) Twenty-five percent of the payment shall be deposited into the Athletic Commission Fund to be used for referee training, payment, and education.(c) Sponsorship contracts entered into pursuant to this section shall not do either of the following:(1) Promote a sham or fake contest, as those terms are used in Section 18858.(2) Promote the use of prohibited substances, as described in Section 18649, or illegal substances.(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Approved sponsor” means a sponsor for whom all of the following are true:(A) The sponsor is in compliance with both of the following:(i) All applicable laws and regulations pertaining to their business or profession.(ii) Any other laws as determined by the commission.(B) The sponsor does not have a financial interest in a licensee participating in, or the outcome of, a contest in which the sponsor’s name or approved logo appears pursuant to this section.(C) The sponsor does not otherwise conflict with the commission’s priorities pursuant to Section 18602.1.(2) “Indian tribe” means a federally recognized Indian tribe and any department, division, subdivision, agency, or arm or instrumentality thereof.(3) “Nonprofit organization” means a tax-exempt organization as defined under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.(e) The commission shall not enter into a contract or agreement until it has promulgated regulations establishing and describing the entire procurement lifecycle life cycle for contracts and agreements under this section consistent with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, all of the following: section. The regulations shall establish and describe all of the following to the extent they are not already required and made public pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a):(1) The procedures for evaluating and selecting applicants, including the scoring methodology and each criterion used.(2) The permissible provisions of the contracts and agreements.(3) The process, phases, and procedures used to ensure equity and transparency in the procurement lifestyle. life cycle.(f) Notwithstanding Section 18878, a violation of this section is not a crime.SEC. 3. Section 18888.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:18888.5. (a) After the participating martial artist has vested in the MMA Fund, the participating martial artist shall not be entitled to distribution of the funds held in the participating martial artist’s regular account until the participating martial artist is at least 50 years of age.(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commission may, in its discretion, award to a participating martial artist, who has vested in the MMA Fund but is younger than 50 years old, an early retirement benefit for vocational, education, training, or medical need in the amount contained in the participating martial artist’s regular account at the time the commission makes this award and in the manner provided in the regulations governing the MMA Fund.(2) Upon distribution of the early retirement benefit authorized by paragraph (1) to the participating martial artist, the participating martial artist’s regular account shall be closed, and the participating martial artist shall not receive, or otherwise be eligible for, any further contributions to the regular account or retirement benefits from the MMA Fund.(3) Notwithstanding any other law, information submitted by or to a participating martial artist pursuant to this subdivision shall be confidential and not subject to public disclosure unless any of the following applies:(A) The martial artist, in writing, waives the confidentiality of information submitted to the commission.(B) The information is disclosed pursuant to a lawfully issued subpoena.(C) The information is disclosed pursuant to a written request from a government agency responsible for the enforcement of civil or criminal laws or the professional licensing of individuals that is conducting an investigation about the person who submitted the information to the commission.(c) Notwithstanding any other law, if the commission determines that the balance in the MMA Fund sufficiently exceeds the amount needed for anticipated future payments from the MMA Fund, the commission may make a one-time payment from revenue deposited into the MMA Fund from the proceeds of sponsorship contracts pursuant to Section 18829, to those individuals who would have met the vesting requirements under Section 18888.6 if the criteria for vesting in effect on January 1, 2026, had been established on January 1, 2006.SEC. 4. The Legislature finds and declares that the amendment of Section 18888.5 of the Business and Professions Code by this act serves a public purpose of promoting the fair and equitable treatment of former professional martial artists who would have earned a vested pension interest had the state created a retirement fund when the sport was first approved and does not constitute a gift of public funds within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.